South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S487.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Natural Resources, relating to Deer Processors and Donated Deer Processing Fee Recovery, designated as Regulation Document Number 5330, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Department of Natural Resources proposes to add Regulation 123-56 "Deer Processors and Donated Deer Processing Recovery Fee". The subject of the proposed action is to amend the regulations to add provisions in order to permit deer processors to process legally taken female (doe) deer donated by a hunter or deer depredation permittee and recover the fee of processing the deer from a person other than the individual who donated the deer. The regulation prescribes the necessary guidelines to implement SC Code of Laws 50-11-1910(B). It provides direction and conditions for deer processors to obtain a permit to process legally taken female (doe) deer donated by a hunter or deer depredation permittee and recover the fee of processing the deer from a person other than the individual who donated the deer. Additionally, the regulation prescribes direction for reporting fee recoveries taken under the permit. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on September 27, 2024. ----XX----